Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 1. Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures
§ 16-4-124.
Payment of expenses to conventions or meetings; required specific appropriation; violation.

It is unlawful for any board of county commissioners or any town or city council to allow or pay out of the county or city funds, any bill for expenses incurred by any county officer or representative of the county, or of any municipal officer, representative or employee incurred while attending any convention or meeting of any peace officers or other convention or meeting of officers, employees or representatives either within or without the state of Wyoming, unless the adopted budget for the city, town or county provides for the payment of actual expense of any officer while attending meetings or conventions within or without the state of Wyoming and then only after the city or town council or board of county commissioners, as the case may be, shall specifically appropriate for those purposes. Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00), nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), imprisoned in the county jail for a period of not less than thirty (30) days, nor more than ninety (90) days, or both.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 102, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 30-142; C.S. 1945, § 20-207; Laws 1951, ch. 89, § 1; 1955, ch. 70, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-503; W.S. 1977, §

9-7-101

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2001, ch. 199, § 1.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 2, ch. 102, Laws 1931, repeals all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

§ 16-4-125.
Fiscal year for governmental entities; budget format for certain entities not subject to the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act.

The fiscal year for all governmental entities within this state, no matter how formed, shall commence on July 1 in each year, except as otherwise specifically provided or authorized by law.

Hospital districts organized under W.S.

35-2-401

through

35-2-438

and rural health care districts organized under W.S.

35-2-701

through

35-2-709

shall have until July 1, 2011 to commence the district fiscal year on July 1 of each year.

Incorporated towns not subject to the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act and public entities receiving funds from a municipality as defined by W.S. 16-4-102(a)(xiv), shall prepare budgets in a format acceptable to the director of the state department of audit.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 1; 2017 ch. 62, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (c), deleted “special purpose districts having the authority under the general laws of Wyoming to levy taxes or impose assessments” following “Fiscal Procedures Act.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law. The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts. Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.